Utah statutes.
59-2-1008.   Investigations by commission -- Assessment of escaped property
-- Increase or decrease of assessed valuation.
(1)  Each year the commission shall conduct an investigation throughout each
county of the state to determine whether all property subject to taxation is
on the assessment rolls, and whether the property is being assessed at fair
market value.  When, after any investigation, it is found that any property
which is subject to taxation is not assessed, then the commission shall direct
the county assessor, the county board of equalization, or the county auditor,
as it may determine, to enter the assessment of the escaped property.
(2)  If it is found that any property in any county is not being assessed at
its fair market value, the commission shall, for the purpose of equalizing the
value of property in the state, increase or decrease the valuation of the
property in order to enforce the assessment of all property subject to
taxation upon the basis of its fair market value, and shall direct the county
assessor, the county board of equalization, or the county auditor, as it may
determine, to correct the value of the property in a manner prescribed by the
commission.
(3)  The county assessors, county boards of equalization, and county auditors
shall make all increases or decreases as may be required by the commission to
make the assessment of all property within the county conform to its fair
market value.
